Illinois, session 104th, HB1482.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by changing Section 110-6.1 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 5/110-6.1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 110-6.1)7    Sec. 110-6.1. Denial of pretrial release. 8    (a) Upon verified petition by the State, the court shall 9hold a hearing and may deny a defendant pretrial release only 10if:11        (1) the defendant is charged with a felony offense 12    other than a forcible felony for which, based on the 13    charge or the defendant's criminal history, a sentence of 14    imprisonment, without probation, periodic imprisonment or 15    conditional discharge, is required by law upon conviction, 16    and it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release 17    poses a real and present threat to the safety of any person 18    or persons or the community, based on the specific 19    articulable facts of the case;20        (1.5) (blank); the defendant's pretrial release poses 21    a real and present threat to the safety of any person or 22    persons or the community, based on the specific 23    articulable facts of the case, and the defendant is   HB1482- 2 -LRB104 03494 RLC 13517 b1    charged with a forcible felony, which as used in this 2    Section, means treason, first degree murder, second degree 3    murder, predatory criminal sexual assault of a child, 4    aggravated criminal sexual assault, criminal sexual 5    assault, armed robbery, aggravated robbery, robbery, 6    burglary where there is use of force against another 7    person, residential burglary, home invasion, vehicular 8    invasion, aggravated arson, arson, aggravated kidnaping, 9    kidnaping, aggravated battery resulting in great bodily 10    harm or permanent disability or disfigurement or any other 11    felony which involves the threat of or infliction of great 12    bodily harm or permanent disability or disfigurement; 13        (2) (blank); the defendant is charged with stalking or 14    aggravated stalking, and it is alleged that the 15    defendant's pre-trial release poses a real and present 16    threat to the safety of a victim of the alleged offense, 17    and denial of release is necessary to prevent fulfillment 18    of the threat upon which the charge is based;19        (3) the defendant is charged with a violation of an 20    order of protection issued under Section 112A-14 of this 21    Code or Section 214 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act 22    of 1986, a stalking no contact order under Section 80 of 23    the Stalking No Contact Order Act, or of a civil no contact 24    order under Section 213 of the Civil No Contact Order Act, 25    and it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release 26    poses a real and present threat to the safety of any person   HB1482- 3 -LRB104 03494 RLC 13517 b1    or persons or the community, based on the specific 2    articulable facts of the case;3        (4) the defendant is charged with misdemeanor domestic 4    battery or aggravated domestic battery under Section 5    12-3.2 or 12-3.3 of the Criminal Code of 2012 and it is 6    alleged that the defendant's pretrial release poses a real 7    and present threat to the safety of any person or persons 8    or the community, based on the specific articulable facts 9    of the case;10        (5) the defendant is charged with any offense under 11    Article 11 of the Criminal Code of 2012, except for 12    Sections 11-14, 11-14.1, 11-18, 11-20, 11-30, 11-35, 13    11-40, and 11-45 of the Criminal Code of 2012, or similar 14    provisions of the Criminal Code of 1961 and it is alleged 15    that the defendant's pretrial release poses a real and 16    present threat to the safety of any person or persons or 17    the community, based on the specific articulable facts of 18    the case; 19        (6) (blank); the defendant is charged with any of the 20    following offenses under the Criminal Code of 2012, and it 21    is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release poses a 22    real and present threat to the safety of any person or 23    persons or the community, based on the specific 24    articulable facts of the case:25            (A) Section 24-1.2 (aggravated discharge of a 26        firearm);  HB1482- 4 -LRB104 03494 RLC 13517 b1            (B) Section 24-2.5 (aggravated discharge of a 2        machine gun or a firearm equipped with a device 3        designed or use for silencing the report of a 4        firearm);5            (C) Section 24-1.5 (reckless discharge of a 6        firearm);7            (D) Section 24-1.7 (unlawful possession of a 8        firearm by a repeat felony offender);9            (E) Section 24-2.2 (manufacture, sale or transfer 10        of bullets or shells represented to be armor piercing 11        bullets, dragon's breath shotgun shells, bolo shells, 12        or flechette shells);13            (F) Section 24-3 (unlawful sale or delivery of 14        firearms);15            (G) Section 24-3.3 (unlawful sale or delivery of 16        firearms on the premises of any school);17            (H) Section 24-34 (unlawful sale of firearms by 18        liquor license);19            (I) Section 24-3.5 (unlawful purchase of a 20        firearm);21            (J) Section 24-3A (gunrunning);22            (K) Section 24-3B (firearms trafficking);23            (L) Section 10-9 (b) (involuntary servitude);24            (M) Section 10-9 (c) (involuntary sexual servitude 25        of a minor);26            (N) Section 10-9(d) (trafficking in persons);  HB1482- 5 -LRB104 03494 RLC 13517 b1            (O) Non-probationable violations: (i) unlawful 2        possession of weapons by felons or persons in the 3        Custody of the Department of Corrections facilities 4        (Section 24-1.1), (ii) aggravated unlawful possession 5        of a weapon (Section 24-1.6), or (iii) aggravated 6        possession of a stolen firearm (Section 24-3.9);7            (P) Section 9-3 (reckless homicide and involuntary 8        manslaughter);9            (Q) Section 19-3 (residential burglary);10            (R) Section 10-5 (child abduction);11            (S) Felony violations of Section 12C-5 (child 12        endangerment);13            (T) Section 12-7.1 (hate crime);14            (U) Section 10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful 15        restraint);16            (V) Section 12-9 (threatening a public official);17            (W) Subdivision (f)(1) of Section 12-3.05 18        (aggravated battery with a deadly weapon other than by 19        discharge of a firearm);20        (6.5) (blank); the defendant is charged with any of 21    the following offenses, and it is alleged that the 22    defendant's pretrial release poses a real and present 23    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the 24    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the 25    case: 26            (A) Felony violations of Sections 3.01, 3.02, or   HB1482- 6 -LRB104 03494 RLC 13517 b1        3.03 of the Humane Care for Animals Act (cruel 2        treatment, aggravated cruelty, and animal torture);3            (B) Subdivision (d)(1)(B) of Section 11-501 of the 4        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 5        influence while operating a school bus with 6        passengers);7            (C) Subdivision (d)(1)(C) of Section 11-501 of the 8        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 9        influence causing great bodily harm);10            (D) Subdivision (d)(1)(D) of Section 11-501 of the 11        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 12        influence after a previous reckless homicide 13        conviction);14            (E) Subdivision (d)(1)(F) of Section 11-501 of the 15        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 16        influence leading to death); or17            (F) Subdivision (d)(1)(J) of Section 11-501 of the 18        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 19        influence that resulted in bodily harm to a child 20        under the age of 16);21        (7) the defendant is charged with an attempt to commit 22    any charge listed in paragraphs (1) through (5) (6.5), and 23    it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release poses 24    a real and present threat to the safety of any person or 25    persons or the community, based on the specific 26    articulable facts of the case; or   HB1482- 7 -LRB104 03494 RLC 13517 b1        (8) the person has a high likelihood of willful flight 2    to avoid prosecution and is charged with a felony; or 3        (9) the defendant has been convicted of 2 or more of 4    the same felonies or misdemeanors and either:5            (A) it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial 6        release poses a real and present threat to the safety 7        of any person or persons or the community, based on the 8        specific articulable facts of the case; or9            (B) the defendant has a high likelihood of willful 10        flight to avoid prosecution. :11            (A) Any felony described in subdivisions (a)(1) 12    through (a)(7) of this Section; or13            (B) A felony offense other than a Class 4 offense.14    (b) If the charged offense is a felony, as part of the 15detention hearing, the court shall determine whether there is 16probable cause the defendant has committed an offense, unless 17a hearing pursuant to Section 109-3 of this Code has already 18been held or a grand jury has returned a true bill of 19indictment against the defendant. If there is a finding of no 20probable cause, the defendant shall be released. No such 21finding is necessary if the defendant is charged with a 22misdemeanor.23    (c) Timing of petition. 24        (1) A petition may be filed without prior notice to 25    the defendant at the first appearance before a judge, or 26    within the 21 calendar days, except as provided in Section   HB1482- 8 -LRB104 03494 RLC 13517 b1    110-6, after arrest and release of the defendant upon 2    reasonable notice to defendant; provided that while such 3    petition is pending before the court, the defendant if 4    previously released shall not be detained.5        (2) Upon filing, the court shall immediately hold a 6    hearing on the petition unless a continuance is requested. 7    If a continuance is requested and granted, the hearing 8    shall be held within 48 hours of the defendant's first 9    appearance if the defendant is charged with first degree 10    murder or a Class X, Class 1, Class 2, or Class 3 felony, 11    and within 24 hours if the defendant is charged with a 12    Class 4 or misdemeanor offense. The Court may deny or 13    grant the request for continuance. If the court decides to 14    grant the continuance, the Court retains the discretion to 15    detain or release the defendant in the time between the 16    filing of the petition and the hearing.17    (d) Contents of petition.18        (1) The petition shall be verified by the State and 19    shall state the grounds upon which it contends the 20    defendant should be denied pretrial release, including the 21    real and present threat to the safety of any person or 22    persons or the community, based on the specific 23    articulable facts or flight risk, as appropriate.24        (2) If the State seeks to file a second or subsequent 25    petition under this Section, the State shall be required 26    to present a verified application setting forth in detail   HB1482- 9 -LRB104 03494 RLC 13517 b1    any new facts not known or obtainable at the time of the 2    filing of the previous petition.3    (e) Eligibility: All defendants shall be presumed eligible 4for pretrial release, and the State shall bear the burden of 5proving by a preponderance of the clear and convincing 6evidence that:7        (1) the proof is evident or the presumption great that 8    the defendant has committed an offense listed in 9    subsection (a), and10        (2) for offenses listed in paragraphs (1) through (7) 11    of subsection (a), the defendant poses a real and present 12    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the 13    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the 14    case, by conduct which may include, but is not limited to, 15    a forcible felony, the obstruction of justice, 16    intimidation, injury, or abuse as defined by paragraph (1) 17    of Section 103 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 18    1986, and19        (3) no condition or combination of conditions set 20    forth in subsection (b) of Section 110-10 of this Article 21    can mitigate (i) the real and present threat to the safety 22    of any person or persons or the community, based on the 23    specific articulable facts of the case, for offenses 24    listed in paragraphs (1) through (7) of subsection (a), or 25    (ii) the defendant's willful flight for offenses listed in 26    paragraph (8) of subsection (a), and  HB1482- 10 -LRB104 03494 RLC 13517 b1        (4) for offenses under subsection (b) of Section 407 2    of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act that are subject 3    to paragraph (1) of subsection (a), no condition or 4    combination of conditions set forth in subsection (b) of 5    Section 110-10 of this Article can mitigate the real and 6    present threat to the safety of any person or persons or 7    the community, based on the specific articulable facts of 8    the case, and the defendant poses a serious risk to not 9    appear in court as required.10    (f) Conduct of the hearings.11        (1) Prior to the hearing, the State shall tender to 12    the defendant copies of the defendant's criminal history 13    available, any written or recorded statements, and the 14    substance of any oral statements made by any person, if 15    relied upon by the State in its petition, and any police 16    reports in the prosecutor's possession at the time of the 17    hearing.18        (2) The State or defendant may present evidence at the 19    hearing by way of proffer based upon reliable information.20        (3) The defendant has the right to be represented by 21    counsel, and if he or she is indigent, to have counsel 22    appointed for him or her. The defendant shall have the 23    opportunity to testify, to present witnesses on his or her 24    own behalf, and to cross-examine any witnesses that are 25    called by the State. Defense counsel shall be given 26    adequate opportunity to confer with the defendant before   HB1482- 11 -LRB104 03494 RLC 13517 b1    any hearing at which conditions of release or the 2    detention of the defendant are to be considered, with an 3    accommodation for a physical condition made to facilitate 4    attorney/client consultation. If defense counsel needs to 5    confer or consult with the defendant during any hearing 6    conducted via a 2-way two-way audio-visual communication 7    system, such consultation shall not be recorded and shall 8    be undertaken consistent with constitutional protections. 9        (3.5) A hearing at which pretrial release may be 10    denied must be conducted in person (and not by way of 2-way 11    two-way audio visual communication) unless the accused 12    waives the right to be present physically in court, the 13    court determines that the physical health and safety of 14    any person necessary to the proceedings would be 15    endangered by appearing in court, or the chief judge of 16    the circuit orders use of that system due to operational 17    challenges in conducting the hearing in person. Such 18    operational challenges must be documented and approved by 19    the chief judge of the circuit, and a plan to address the 20    challenges through reasonable efforts must be presented 21    and approved by the Administrative Office of the Illinois 22    Courts every 6 months. 23        (4) If the defense seeks to compel the complaining 24    witness to testify as a witness in its favor, it shall 25    petition the court for permission. When the ends of 26    justice so require, the court may exercise its discretion   HB1482- 12 -LRB104 03494 RLC 13517 b1    and compel the appearance of a complaining witness. The 2    court shall state on the record reasons for granting a 3    defense request to compel the presence of a complaining 4    witness only on the issue of the defendant's pretrial 5    detention. In making a determination under this Section, 6    the court shall state on the record the reason for 7    granting a defense request to compel the presence of a 8    complaining witness, and only grant the request if the 9    court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the 10    defendant will be materially prejudiced if the complaining 11    witness does not appear. Cross-examination of a 12    complaining witness at the pretrial detention hearing for 13    the purpose of impeaching the witness' credibility is 14    insufficient reason to compel the presence of the witness. 15    In deciding whether to compel the appearance of a 16    complaining witness, the court shall be considerate of the 17    emotional and physical well-being of the witness. The 18    pre-trial detention hearing is not to be used for purposes 19    of discovery, and the post arraignment rules of discovery 20    do not apply. The State shall tender to the defendant, 21    prior to the hearing, copies, if any, of the defendant's 22    criminal history, if available, and any written or 23    recorded statements and the substance of any oral 24    statements made by any person, if in the State's 25    Attorney's possession at the time of the hearing. 26        (5) The rules concerning the admissibility of evidence   HB1482- 13 -LRB104 03494 RLC 13517 b1    in criminal trials do not apply to the presentation and 2    consideration of information at the hearing. At the trial 3    concerning the offense for which the hearing was conducted 4    neither the finding of the court nor any transcript or 5    other record of the hearing shall be admissible in the 6    State's case-in-chief, but shall be admissible for 7    impeachment, or as provided in Section 115-10.1 of this 8    Code, or in a perjury proceeding.9        (6) The defendant may not move to suppress evidence or 10    a confession, however, evidence that proof of the charged 11    crime may have been the result of an unlawful search or 12    seizure, or both, or through improper interrogation, is 13    relevant in assessing the weight of the evidence against 14    the defendant.15        (7) Decisions regarding release, conditions of 16    release, and detention prior to trial must be 17    individualized, and no single factor or standard may be 18    used exclusively to order detention. Risk assessment tools 19    may not be used as the sole basis to deny pretrial release. 20    (g) Factors to be considered in making a determination of 21dangerousness. The court may, in determining whether the 22defendant poses a real and present threat to the safety of any 23person or persons or the community, based on the specific 24articulable facts of the case, consider, but shall not be 25limited to, evidence or testimony concerning:26        (1) The nature and circumstances of any offense   HB1482- 14 -LRB104 03494 RLC 13517 b1    charged, including whether the offense is a crime of 2    violence, involving a weapon, or a sex offense.3        (2) The history and characteristics of the defendant 4    including:5            (A) Any evidence of the defendant's prior criminal 6        history indicative of violent, abusive, or assaultive 7        behavior, or lack of such behavior. Such evidence may 8        include testimony or documents received in juvenile 9        proceedings, criminal, quasi-criminal, civil 10        commitment, domestic relations, or other proceedings.11            (B) Any evidence of the defendant's psychological, 12        psychiatric or other similar social history which 13        tends to indicate a violent, abusive, or assaultive 14        nature, or lack of any such history.15        (3) The identity of any person or persons to whose 16    safety the defendant is believed to pose a threat, and the 17    nature of the threat.18        (4) Any statements made by, or attributed to the 19    defendant, together with the circumstances surrounding 20    them.21        (5) The age and physical condition of the defendant.22        (6) The age and physical condition of any victim or 23    complaining witness. 24        (7) Whether the defendant is known to possess or have 25    access to any weapon or weapons.26        (8) Whether, at the time of the current offense or any   HB1482- 15 -LRB104 03494 RLC 13517 b1    other offense or arrest, the defendant was on probation, 2    parole, aftercare release, mandatory supervised release, 3    or other release from custody pending trial, sentencing, 4    appeal, or completion of sentence for an offense under 5    federal or State state law.6        (9) Any other factors, including those listed in 7    Section 110-5 of this Article deemed by the court to have a 8    reasonable bearing upon the defendant's propensity or 9    reputation for violent, abusive, or assaultive behavior, 10    or lack of such behavior.11    (h) Detention order. The court shall, in any order for 12detention:13        (1) make a written finding summarizing the court's 14    reasons for concluding that the defendant should be denied 15    pretrial release, including why less restrictive 16    conditions would not avoid a real and present threat to 17    the safety of any person or persons or the community, 18    based on the specific articulable facts of the case, or 19    prevent the defendant's willful flight from prosecution;20        (2) direct that the defendant be committed to the 21    custody of the sheriff for confinement in the county jail 22    pending trial;23        (3) direct that the defendant be given a reasonable 24    opportunity for private consultation with counsel, and for 25    communication with others of his or her choice by 26    visitation, mail and telephone; and  HB1482- 16 -LRB104 03494 RLC 13517 b1        (4) direct that the sheriff deliver the defendant as 2    required for appearances in connection with court 3    proceedings.4    (i) Detention. If the court enters an order for the 5detention of the defendant pursuant to subsection (e) of this 6Section, the defendant shall be brought to trial on the 7offense for which he is detained within 90 days after the date 8on which the order for detention was entered. If the defendant 9is not brought to trial within the 90-day period required by 10the preceding sentence, he shall not be denied pretrial 11release. In computing the 90-day period, the court shall omit 12any period of delay resulting from a continuance granted at 13the request of the defendant and any period of delay resulting 14from a continuance granted at the request of the State with 15good cause shown pursuant to Section 103-5.16    (i-5) At each subsequent appearance of the defendant 17before the court, the judge must find that continued detention 18is necessary to avoid a real and present threat to the safety 19of any person or persons or the community, based on the 20specific articulable facts of the case, or to prevent the 21defendant's willful flight from prosecution. 22    (j) Rights of the defendant. The defendant shall be 23entitled to appeal any order entered under this Section 24denying his or her pretrial release.25    (k) Appeal. The State may appeal any order entered under 26this Section denying any motion for denial of pretrial   HB1482- 17 -LRB104 03494 RLC 13517 b1release.2    (l) Presumption of innocence. Nothing in this Section 3shall be construed as modifying or limiting in any way the 4defendant's presumption of innocence in further criminal 5proceedings.6    (m) Interest of victims. 7        (1) Crime victims shall be given notice by the State's 8    Attorney's office of this hearing as required in paragraph 9    (1) of subsection (b) of Section 4.5 of the Rights of Crime 10    Victims and Witnesses Act and shall be informed of their 11    opportunity at this hearing to obtain a protective order. 12        (2) If the defendant is denied pretrial release, the 13    court may impose a no contact provision with the victim or 14    other interested party that shall be enforced while the 15    defendant remains in custody. 16(Source: P.A. 102-1104, eff. 1-1-23; 103-822, eff. 1-1-25; 17revised 10-23-24.)